Utah statutes.
79-2-202 (Contingently Superseded).   Executive director -- Appointment --
Removal -- Compensation -- Responsibilities.
(1) (a)  The chief administrative officer of the department is an executive
director appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  The executive director may be removed at the will of the governor.
(c)  The executive director shall receive a salary established by the governor
within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22,
State Officer Compensation.
(2)  The executive director shall:
(a)  administer and supervise the department and provide for coordination and
cooperation among the boards, divisions, councils, and committees of the
department;
(b)  approve the budget of each board and division;
(c)  participate in regulatory proceedings as appropriate for the functions
and duties of the department;
(d)  report at the end of each fiscal year to the governor on department,
board, and division activities; and
(e)  perform other duties as provided by statute.
(3)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5,
Federal Funds Procedures Act, the executive director, may accept an executive
or legislative provision that is enacted by the federal government, whereby
the state may participate in the distribution, disbursement, or administration
of a fund or service from the federal government for purposes consistent with
the powers and duties of the department.
(4) (a)  The executive director, in cooperation with the governmental entities
having policymaking authority regarding natural resources, may engage in
studies and comprehensive planning for the development and conservation of the
state's natural resources.
(b)  The executive director shall submit any plan to the governor for review
and approval.
